Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 27
Forest Conservation Act

2-27-1.
Statement of legislative purpose.

The general assembly recognizes that forest land in the state has many important values, including, but not limited to: clean air, clean water, economic importance, climate change mitigation, habitat, and supporting human health and well-being. Forest
land should be maintained to meet Rhode Island’s aggressive climate change goals through carbon sequestration and storage. Core forest land and connecting natural areas should be conserved to prevent ongoing fragmentation of the
state’s forests. Moreover, forest conservation is necessary to protect and maintain water quality and important wildlife habitat. It is in the best interest of the people that the state identify and acquire the development rights
to core and unfragmented forests so as to maintain these important forest values for future generations. Moreover, the state must develop incentives to encourage private forest land owners to maintain forests and to enhance urban
and community forestry ecosystems that provide collective benefits to people and wildlife, including filtering air and water, controlling storm water, conserving energy, and a myriad of additional critical benefits.

The general assembly finds that forest land is being converted to other uses because its current development value far exceeds its economic value to individual private landowners as forest; that forest land is an important part of the state’s economy,
environment, and quality of life; and that forests provide important economic opportunities for many people living in the rural portions of the state. Whereas most of the development value of forests accrue to the private landowner,
many of the economic benefits of retaining forests are also public benefits, some of which are not often quantified. All of this serves to undervalue forests without proper mechanisms and tools to account for public services and
cost savings provided by private forests.

Therefore, the general assembly establishes a forest conservation commission to be coordinated and staffed by the department of environmental management to implement the following objectives:

Assess and recommend new funding sources to conserve forest land across the forest continuum of rural to urban landscapes;

Identify incentives to encourage forest landowners to maintain and manage their land and preserve forest values;

Encourage forest conservation as a means to sequester carbon and mitigate climate change and maintain the numerous other benefits provided by forests;

Help to increase and create new markets for Rhode Island forest products to store carbon long-term and create new jobs;

Assess impediments to the expansion of the Rhode Island forest products industry and recommend changes to remove impediments;

Assess means to encourage the improvement and expansion of urban and community forestry; and

Coordinate and seek input from key stakeholders to identify other science-based initiatives to promote the conservation of Rhode Island forestland.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter;

“Department” means the department of environmental management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management, unless otherwise specified.

“Forest-based business” means the inclusion of all the activities that go into harvesting forest products and turning them into usable products. These businesses include foresters, loggers, and truckers who manage, harvest, and transport raw materials
and the companies that turn these raw materials into usable products for purchase in a variety of markets.

“Forest conservation commission” or “commission” means the commission established pursuant to §

2-27-3

.

“Forest fragmentation” means the breaking of large, contiguous, forested areas into smaller pieces of forest; typically, these pieces are separated by roads, utility corridors, subdivisions, or other human development.

“Forest land” means any tract or contiguous tracts of land, ten (10) acres or larger bearing a dense growth of trees, including any underbrush, and having either the quality of self-perpetuation, or being dependent upon its development by the planting
and replanting of trees in stands of closely growing timber.

“Forest management” means the focus on managing vegetation, restoring ecosystems and habitat, reducing hazards, and maintaining forest health for a desired outcome.

“Fund” means the forest land conservation fund established pursuant to §

2-27-6

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-3.
Forest conservation commission.

There is established the forest conservation commission consisting of the directors of the department of environmental management and the department of administration, or their respective designees; and nine (9) public members to be appointed by the director
of the department of environmental management. The public appointees shall include at least one member with knowledge or experience in forestry; one member with knowledge or experience with urban and community forestry;
one member familiar with land use and community planning issues; one member active in land preservation; one member representing forest landowners; one member representing an environmental organization; one member with
knowledge of forest habitat; and one member representing a forest products business. No person shall be eligible for appointment pursuant to this section unless he or she is a resident of this state.

The members shall serve for terms of five (5) years each; provided, however, that of the members first appointed, one shall serve for one year, one shall serve for two (2) years, one shall serve for three (3) years, one shall serve for four (4) years,
and the remaining members shall serve for five (5) years, from January first next succeeding their appointment, as the director shall designate.

Any vacancy occurring otherwise than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Upon expiration of a member’s term, that member shall continue as a member until that member’s successor is appointed and qualified. Any person serving a term shall be eligible for appointment.

No member, including ex officio members, shall receive compensation for the performance of his or her duties as a member; provided, however, that each appointed member may be reimbursed if funds are appropriated for his or her actual and necessary expenses
incurred during the performance of his or her official duties.

The commission shall designate annually from its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson.

Whenever public hearings are required under this chapter, or whenever the commission determines a public hearing is appropriate, the commission shall use reasonable efforts to hold those hearings at a place or places that will reasonably accommodate the
interested parties.

Seven (7) voting members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power of the commission. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission shall have the power to act by a majority
of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.

The director may remove any member for cause or misconduct in office after giving him or her a copy of the charges against him or her and an opportunity to be heard, in person or by counsel, in his or her defense, upon not less than ten (10) days’ notice.
If any member shall be removed, the director shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete statement of charges made against the member and his or her findings, together with a complete record of the proceedings.

The director shall have the authority to establish subcommittees to fulfill the purposes of the commission. The subcommittee members shall be advisory to the commission and shall be comprised of key stakeholders representative of the issue(s) to be addressed.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-4.
Powers of commission.

The commission has the power to:

Retain by contract or employ counsel, auditors, engineers, appraisers, private consultants and advisors, or other personnel needed to provide necessary services;

Request the assistance of staff from the department or other state agencies on an as-needed basis;

Accept gifts, grants, or loans of funds, or services from any source, public or private, and comply, subject to the provisions of this chapter, with the terms and conditions thereof;

Accept from a federal agency loans or grants for use in carrying out its purposes and enter into agreement with an agency respecting those loans or grants; and

Otherwise do all things necessary for the performance of its duties, the fulfillment of its obligations, and the conduct of its business.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-5.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall:

Develop the criteria necessary for defining the most important forest land under this chapter;

Make a reasonably accurate inventory of all land in the state that meets the definition of forest land;

Inform the public, public officials, and other citizens and interested persons of the provisions of this chapter; and

Make recommendations to the director of the department of environmental management regarding disbursements from the forest land conservation fund.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-6.
Forest land conservation fund.

There is hereby established a forest land conservation fund.

The fund may be utilized for purposes consistent with this chapter.

The fund shall consist of the following sources:

Sums the legislature may appropriate;

Monies received from federal, state, or other sources, including bond funds;

Monies received from any other sources including from any private donor for the fund;

Any interest earned on the monies in the fund.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.

2-27-7.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order made under this chapter, or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, rule,
regulation, or order, and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the
validity of the remainder of this chapter, and it is declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if those invalid parts had not been included in this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 2021, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 7, 2021.